Maryland, session 2026, HB1429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; [or]
(XLIX) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 51 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(L) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 52 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 51. MOTOR VEHICLE REPAIR.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DEALER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–111 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(C) “FRANCHISE AGREEMENT” MEANS AN ORAL OR WRITTEN
ARRANGEMENT IN WHICH:
(1) A MANUFACTURER GRANTS A LICENSE TO A DEALER TO USE A
TRADE NAME, SERVICE MARK, OR RELATED CHARACTERISTIC; AND
(2) THERE IS A COMMUNITY OF INTEREST IN THE MARKETING OF NEW
MOTOR VEHICLES OR RELATED SERVICES AT WHOLESALE, RETAIL, LEASING, OR
OTHERWISE.
(D) “HEAVY–DUTY VEHICLE” MEANS A VEHICLE HAVING A GROSS VEHICLE
WEIGHT RATING OF MORE THAN 14,000 POUNDS.

HOUSE BILL 1429 3
(E) “IMMOBILIZER SYSTEM” MEANS AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE DESIGNED
FOR THE SOLE PURPOSE OF PREVENTING THE THEFT OF A MOTOR VEHICLE BY
PREVENTING THE MOTOR VEHICLE IN WHICH IT IS INSTALLED FROM STARTING
WITHOUT THE CORRECT ACTIVATION OR AUTHORIZATION CODE.
(F) (1) “INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY” MEANS A PERSON THAT IS NOT
AFFILIATED WITH A MANUFACTURER OR A MANUFACTURER’S AUTHORIZED DEALER
THAT DIAGNOSES, SERVICES, MAINTAINS, OR REPAIRS MOTOR VEHICLES OR MOTOR
VEHICLE ENGINES.
(2) “INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY” INCLUDES A DEALER WHEN
THE DEALER DIAGNOSES, SERVICES, MAINTAINS, OR REPAIRS MOTOR VEHICLES OR
MOTOR VEHICLE ENGINES THAT ARE NOT AFFILIATED WITH THE DEALER’S
FRANCHISE MANUFACTURER.
(G) “MANUFACTURER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–132 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(H) “MOTOR VEHICLE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–135 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(I) “OWNER” MEANS A PERSON THAT OWNS OR LEASES A MOTOR VEHICLE
REGISTERED IN THE STATE.
(J) (1) “TELEMATICS INFORMATION” MEANS INFORMATION GENERATED
AND COLLECTED BY THE OPERATION OF THE VEHICLE AND TRANSMITTED BY USING
WIRELESS COMMUNICATIONS TO A REMOTE RECEIVING POINT WHERE THE
INFORMATION IS STORED.
(2) “TELEMATICS INFORMATION” INCLUDES:
(I) REMOTE DIAGNOSTICS INFORMATION;
(II) AUTOMATIC AIRBAG DEPLOYMENT AND CRASH
NOTIFICATIONS;
(III) STOLEN VEHICLE LOCATIONS;
(IV) NAVIGATION INFORMATION;
(V) REMOTE DOOR UNLOCK;

HOUSE BILL 1429
(VI) TRANSMISSION OF EMERGENCY AND VEHICLE LOCATION
INFORMATION TO PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINTS; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER SERVICE INTEGRATING VEHICLE LOCATION
TECHNOLOGY AND WIRELESS COMMUNICATIONS.
(K) “TELEMATICS SYSTEM” MEANS A TELEMATICS SERVICE OR OTHER
REMOTE OR INFORMATION SERVICE DELIVERED TO OR DERIVED FROM A MOTOR
VEHICLE BY WIRELESS COMMUNICATIONS.
14–5102.
FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE, WHEN DECIDING WHETHER AN OFFER TO
PURCHASE INFORMATION OR TOOLS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS GIVEN ON “FAIR AND
REASONABLE TERMS”, CONSIDERATION MAY BE GIVEN TO THE FOLLOWING
FACTORS:
(1) THE NET COST TO A MANUFACTURER–FRANCHISED DEALERSHIP
FOR SIMILAR INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM MANUFACTURERS, MINUS ANY
DISCOUNTS, REBATES, OR OTHER INCENTIVE PROGRAMS;
(2) THE COST TO A MANUFACTURER FOR PREPARING AND
DISTRIBUTING THE INFORMATION;
(3) THE PRICE CHARGED BY OTHER MANUFACTURERS FOR SIMILAR
INFORMATION;
(4) THE ABILITY OF AFTERMARKET TECHNICIANS TO AFFORD THE
INFORMATION;
(5) THE MEANS BY WHICH THE INFORMATION IS DISTRIBUTED;
(6) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE INFORMATION IS USED, INCLUDING
THE NUMBER OF USERS AND THE FREQUENCY, DURATION, AND VOLUME OF USE;
AND
(7) INFLATION.
14–5103.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A
MANUFACTURER TO DIVULGE A TRADE SECRET, AS DEFINED IN § 11–1201 OF THIS
ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1429 5
(B) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A
MANUFACTURER OR DEALER TO PROVIDE AN OWNER OR INDEPENDENT REPAIR
FACILITY ACCESS TO NONDIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR INFORMATION PROVIDED TO A
MANUFACTURER OR DEALER IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF A FRANCHISE
AGREEMENT.
(C) A FRANCHISE AGREEMENT MAY NOT INCLUDE PROVISIONS THAT WAIVE,
AVOID, RESTRICT, OR LIMIT A MANUFACTURER’S COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A
MANUFACTURER OR A DEALER TO DISCLOSE THE IDENTITY OF EXISTING
CUSTOMERS OR CUSTOMER LISTS.
(E) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ABROGATE A TELEMATICS
SERVICES CONTRACT OR OTHER CONTRACT THAT EXISTS BETWEEN A
MANUFACTURER OR SERVICE PROVIDER, AN OWNER, OR A DEALER.
14–5104.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, FOR MODEL
YEAR 2002 MOTOR VEHICLES AND EACH MODEL YEAR THEREAFTER AND MODEL
YEAR 2013 HEAVY–DUTY VEHICLES AND EACH MODEL YEAR THEREAFTER, A
MANUFACTURER SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE FOR PURCHASE BY OWNERS AND
INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES THE SAME DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR
INFORMATION THAT THE MANUFACTURER MAKES AVAILABLE TO THE
MANUFACTURER’S DEALERS THROUGH THE MANUFACTURER’S INTERNET–BASED
DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR INFORMATION SYSTEM OR OTHER ELECTRONICALLY
ACCESSIBLE MANUFACTURER’S REPAIR INFORMATION SYSTEM.
(B) ALL CONTENT IN A MANUFACTURER’S REPAIR INFORMATION SYSTEM
SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO OWNERS AND TO INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES
IN THE SAME FORM AND MANNER AND TO THE SAME EXTENT AS THE CONTENT IS
MADE AVAILABLE TO DEALERS USING THE DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR INFORMATION
SYSTEM.
(C) A MANUFACTURER SHALL ALLOW OWNERS AND INDEPENDENT REPAIR
FACILITIES TO PURCHASE THE MANUFACTURER’S DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR
INFORMATION:
(1) ON A DAILY, MONTHLY, OR YEARLY SUBSCRIPTION BASIS; AND
(2) ON FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS.

HOUSE BILL 1429
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
MANUFACTURER MAY NOT REQUIRE A DEALER TO PURCHASE DIAGNOSTIC,
SERVICE, OR REPAIR INFORMATION IN A PROPRIETARY FORMAT IF THE
MANUFACTURER SELLS DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, OR REPAIR INFORMATION TO AN
INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY OR OTHER THIRD–PARTY PROVIDER:
(I) IN A FORMAT THAT IS STANDARDIZED WITH OTHER
MANUFACTURERS; AND
(II) ON TERMS AND CONDITIONS MORE FAVORABLE THAN THE
MANNER AND THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS UNDER WHICH A DEALER OBTAINS THE
SAME DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, OR REPAIR INFORMATION.
(2) A MANUFACTURER MAY REQUIRE A DEALER TO PURCHASE
DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, OR REPAIR INFORMATION IN A PROPRIETARY FORMAT IF
THE PROPRIETARY FORMAT INCLUDES DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, REPAIR, OR
DEALERSHIP OPERATIONS INFORMATION OR FUNCTIONALITY THAT IS NOT
AVAILABLE IN THE STANDARDIZED FORMAT.
(E) (1) A MANUFACTURER MAY EXCLUDE DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, AND
REPAIR INFORMATION NECESSARY TO RESET AN IMMOBILIZER SYSTEM OR
SECURITY–RELATED ELECTRONIC MODULES FROM INFORMATION PROVIDED TO
OWNERS AND INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES.
(2) IF A MANUFACTURER EXCLUDES INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN OWNER OR INDEPENDENT REPAIR
FACILITY MAY OBTAIN THE INFORMATION THROUGH THE NATIONAL AUTOMOTIVE
SERVICE TASK FORCE OR ANY OTHER RELIABLE AND ACCEPTED SYSTEM.
14–5105.
(A) (1) FOR MODEL YEAR 2002 MOTOR VEHICLES AND EACH MODEL YEAR
THEREAFTER AND FOR MODEL YEAR 2013 HEAVY–DUTY VEHICLES AND EACH
MODEL YEAR THEREAFTER, A MANUFACTURER SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE FOR
PURCHASE BY OWNERS AND INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES ALL DIAGNOSTIC
REPAIR TOOLS INCORPORATING THE SAME DIAGNOSTIC, REPAIR, AND WIRELESS
CAPABILITIES THAT THE MANUFACTURER MAKES AVAILABLE TO THE
MANUFACTURER’S DEALERS.
(2) THE TOOLS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCORPORATE THE SAME FUNCTIONAL REPAIR CAPABILITIES THAT THE
MANUFACTURER MAKES AVAILABLE TO DEALERS.

HOUSE BILL 1429 7
(3) A MANUFACTURER SHALL OFFER THE TOOLS FOR SALE TO
OWNERS AND TO INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES ON FAIR AND REASONABLE
TERMS.
(B) (1) IF A MANUFACTURER SELLS DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS OR
INFORMATION NECESSARY TO DIAGNOSE, SERVICE, OR REPAIR A MOTOR VEHICLE
TO AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY ON TERMS THAT ARE MORE FAVORABLE
THAN THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS THAT ARE OFFERED TO A DEALER FOR THE SAME
DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS OR INFORMATION, THE MANUFACTURER SHALL OFFER THE
DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS OR INFORMATION TO THE DEALER IN THE SAME MANNER AND
ON THE SAME TERMS AND CONDITIONS AS PROVIDED TO THE INDEPENDENT REPAIR
FACILITY.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A MANUFACTURER MAY NOT REQUIRE A DEALER TO PURCHASE A
PROPRIETARY TOOL AND INTERFACE IF:
1. THE MANUFACTURER SELLS DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS
NECESSARY TO DIAGNOSE, SERVICE, OR REPAIR A MOTOR VEHICLE TO
INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITIES; AND
2. THE DIAGNOSTIC TOOL COMMUNICATES WITH THE
VEHICLE USING THE SAME NONPROPRIETARY INTERFACE USED BY OTHER
MANUFACTURERS.
(II) A MANUFACTURER MAY REQUIRE A DEALER TO PURCHASE
A PROPRIETARY TOOL AND INTERFACE IF THE PROPRIETARY INTERFACE HAS A
CAPABILITY THAT IS NOT AVAILABLE IN THE NONPROPRIETARY INTERFACE.
(C) (1) A MANUFACTURER SHALL PROVIDE DIAGNOSTIC REPAIR
INFORMATION TO AFTERMARKET SCAN TOOL COMPANIES AND THIRD–PARTY
SERVICE INFORMATION PROVIDERS WITH WHOM THE MANUFACTURER HAS A
LICENSING, CONTRACTUAL, OR CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT FOR THE SOLE
PURPOSE OF BUILDING AFTERMARKET DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS AND THIRD–PARTY
SERVICE INFORMATION PUBLICATIONS AND SYSTEMS.
(2) A MANUFACTURER THAT COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS NOT RESPONSIBLE FOR THE CONTENT AND
FUNCTIONALITY OF AFTERMARKET DIAGNOSTIC TOOLS OR SERVICE INFORMATION
SYSTEMS.
14–5106.

HOUSE BILL 1429
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A HEAVY–DUTY VEHICLE BUILT TO
CUSTOM SPECIFICATIONS SOLD FOR COMMERCIAL PURPOSES.
(B) BEGINNING IN MODEL YEAR 2018, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN §
14–5104(E) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A MANUFACTURER SHALL PROVIDE ACCESS TO:
(1) THE MANUFACTURER’S ONBOARD DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR
INFORMATION SYSTEM USING AN OFF–THE–SHELF PERSONAL COMPUTER WITH
SUFFICIENT MEMORY, PROCESSOR SPEED, CONNECTIVITY, AND OTHER
CAPABILITIES AS SPECIFIED BY THE VEHICLE MANUFACTURER; AND
(2) ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) A NONPROPRIETARY VEHICLE INTERFACE DEVICE THAT
COMPLIES WITH:
1. THE SOCIETY OF AUTOMOTIVE ENGINEERS
STANDARD J2534;
2. THE SOCIETY OF AUTOMOTIVE ENGINEERS
STANDARD J1939;
3. THE INTERNATIONAL ORGANIZATION FOR
STANDARDIZATION STANDARD 22900; OR
4. ANY SUCCESSOR TO THE STANDARDS LISTED IN
ITEMS 1 THROUGH 3 OF THIS ITEM AS ACCEPTED OR PUBLISHED BY THE SOCIETY
OF AUTOMOTIVE ENGINEERS OR THE INTERNATIONAL ORGANIZATION FOR
STANDARDIZATION;
(II) AN ONBOARD DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR INFORMATION
SYSTEM INTEGRATED AND ENTIRELY SELF–CONTAINED WITHIN THE VEHICLE,
INCLUDING SERVICE INFORMATION SYSTEMS INTEGRATED INTO AN ONBOARD
DISPLAY; OR
(III) A SYSTEM THAT PROVIDES DIRECT ACCESS TO ONBOARD
DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR INFORMATION THROUGH A NONPROPRIETARY VEHICLE
INTERFACE, SUCH AS ETHERNET, UNIVERSAL SERIAL BUS, OR DIGITAL VERSATILE
DISC.
(C) A MANUFACTURER SHALL PROVIDE OWNERS AND INDEPENDENT
REPAIR FACILITIES WITH THE SAME ACCESS TO ONBOARD DIAGNOSTIC AND REPAIR

HOUSE BILL 1429 9
INFORMATION THAT IS AVAILABLE TO THE MANUFACTURER’S DEALERS, INCLUDING
TECHNICAL UPDATES TO THE ONBOARD SYSTEMS, THROUGH THE
NONPROPRIETARY VEHICLE INTERFACES UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2)(I) OF THIS
SECTION.
(D) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A DEALER TO USE
A NONPROPRIETARY VEHICLE INTERFACE SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION OR TO
PREVENT A MANUFACTURER FROM DEVELOPING A PROPRIETARY VEHICLE
DIAGNOSTIC AND REPROGRAMMING DEVICE IF THE MANUFACTURER:
(1) COMPLIES WITH THIS SECTION;
(2) MAKES THE DEVICE AVAILABLE TO OWNERS AND INDEPENDENT
REPAIR FACILITIES ON FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS; AND
(3) OTHERWISE COMPLIES WITH § 14–5104 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) A MANUFACTURER MAY NOT BE PROHIBITED FROM MAKING
PROPRIETARY TOOLS AVAILABLE TO DEALERS IF THE TOOLS ARE:
(1) FOR A SPECIFIC SPECIALIZED DIAGNOSTIC OR REPAIR
PROCEDURE DEVELOPED FOR THE SOLE PURPOSE OF A CUSTOMER SERVICE
CAMPAIGN MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS SET OUT IN 49 C.F.R. § 579.5; OR
(2) FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF A SPECIFIC TECHNICAL SERVICE
BULLETIN OR RECALL:
(I) AFTER THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS PRODUCED; AND
(II) WHERE THE ORIGINAL MOTOR VEHICLE DESIGN WAS NOT
ORIGINALLY INTENDED FOR DIRECT INTERFACE THROUGH A NONPROPRIETARY
INTERFACE SET OUT UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) IF A PROPRIETARY TOOL IS AVAILABLE TO THE AFTERMARKET ON FAIR
AND REASONABLE TERMS, PROVISION OF A PROPRIETARY TOOL UNDER THIS
SECTION IS NOT A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE EVEN IF THE TOOLS PROVIDE
FUNCTIONS NOT AVAILABLE THROUGH A NONPROPRIETARY VEHICLE INTERFACE
SET FORTH UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION AUTHORIZES A MANUFACTURER TO
EXCLUSIVELY DEVELOP PROPRIETARY TOOLS, WITHOUT A NONPROPRIETARY
EQUIVALENT, FOR DIAGNOSTIC OR REPAIR PROCEDURES THAT FALL OUTSIDE THE

HOUSE BILL 1429
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION OR TO OTHERWISE OPERATE IN A MANNER
INCONSISTENT WITH SUBSECTION (B)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
14–5107.
(A) A MANUFACTURER THAT SELLS MOTOR VEHICLES EQUIPPED WITH A
TELEMATICS SYSTEM SHALL INSTALL AN OPEN DATA PLATFORM IN EACH MOTOR
VEHICLE WITH A TELEMATICS SYSTEM BEGINNING WITH MODEL YEAR 2025.
(B) A TELEMATICS SYSTEM INSTALLED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(1) STANDARDIZED ACROSS ALL MAKES AND MODELS OF MOTOR
VEHICLES; AND
(2) INSTALLED BY AN INDEPENDENT THIRD–PARTY PROVIDER.
(C) AN OWNER SHALL BE ABLE TO:
(1) EASILY ACCESS THE INFORMATION IN THE TELEMATICS SYSTEM;
AND
(2) EASILY GIVE CONSENT TO AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY TO:
(I) ACCESS THE TELEMATICS INFORMATION; AND
(II) SEND COMMANDS TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE’S SYSTEM FOR
DIAGNOSTIC TESTING, REPAIR, OR MAINTENANCE.
14–5108.
(A) THE DIVISION SHALL DEVELOP A DOCUMENT THAT EXPLAINS:
(1) WHAT A TELEMATICS SYSTEM IS; AND
(2) AN OWNER’S RIGHTS RELATING TO:
(I) A TELEMATICS SYSTEM; AND
(II) ACCESS TO INFORMATION AND TOOLS RELATING TO THE
OWNER’S MOTOR VEHICLE.
(B) A MOTOR VEHICLE DEALER SHALL GIVE A CONSUMER WHO BUYS A
MOTOR VEHICLE WITH A TELEMATICS SYSTEM THE DOCUMENT DEVELOPED UNDER

HOUSE BILL 1429 11
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AT THE TIME OF THE PURCHASE OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE.
14–5109.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, A VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY OR OWNER THAT BELIEVES
THAT A MANUFACTURER HAS FAILED TO PROVIDE INFORMATION OR A TOOL
REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE SHALL NOTIFY THE MANUFACTURER, IN WRITING,
THROUGH THE NATIONAL AUTOMOTIVE SERVICE TASK FORCE SERVICE
INFORMATION REQUEST PROCESS.
(2) IF A MANUFACTURER IS NOTIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MANUFACTURER MAY CURE THE
FAILURE WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE TIME THE MANUFACTURER RECEIVES THE
COMPLAINT TO CURE THE FAILURE.
(3) IF THE MANUFACTURER CURES THE FAILURE WITHIN THE CURE
PERIOD DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, DAMAGES SHALL BE
LIMITED TO ACTUAL DAMAGES IN ANY SUBSEQUENT LITIGATION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) (1) IF A MANUFACTURER FAILS TO RESPOND TO THE NOTICE
PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, OR IF AN
OWNER OR INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY IS NOT SATISFIED WITH THE
MANUFACTURER’S CURE, THE INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY OR OWNER MAY
BRING AN ACTION AGAINST THE MANUFACTURER IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 13–408
OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) A COMPLAINT FILED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) WRITTEN CONFIRMATION THAT THE OWNER OR
INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY VISITED THE MANUFACTURER’S WEBSITE AND
ATTEMPTED TO EFFECT A PROPER REPAIR USING INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THE

HOUSE BILL 1429
WEBSITE, INCLUDING COMMUNICATION WITH CUSTOMER ASSISTANCE THROUGH
THE MANUFACTURER’S TOLL–FREE CALL–IN ASSISTANCE, IF MADE AVAILABLE BY
THE MANUFACTURER;
(II) WRITTEN CONFIRMATION THAT THE OWNER OR
INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY OBTAINED AND USED THE RELEVANT
MANUFACTURER’S SCAN OR DIAGNOSTIC TOOL NECESSARY FOR THE REPAIR; AND
(III) EVIDENCE THAT THE MANUFACTURER WAS NOTIFIED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) A DEALER MAY EXERCISE THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES PROVIDED IN
THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING EXERCISING THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES AUTHORIZED
FOR AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR FACILITY.
SUBTITLE 52. FARM EQUIPMENT REPAIR.
14–5201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON THAT IS
UNAFFILIATED WITH THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER AND THAT HAS:
(I) AN ARRANGEMENT WITH THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER UNDER WHICH THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER
GRANTS TO THE PERSON A LICENSE TO USE A TRADE NAME, SERVICE MARK, OR
OTHER PROPRIETARY IDENTIFIER FOR THE PURPOSES OF OFFERING THE SERVICES
OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF FARM EQUIPMENT UNDER THE NAME
OF THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER; OR
(II) ANOTHER ARRANGEMENT WITH THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER TO OFFER THE SERVICES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR
REPAIR ON BEHALF OF THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER.
(2) “AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER” INCLUDES AN ORIGINAL
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER THAT:
(I) OFFERS THE SERVICES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR
REPAIR OF FARM EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURED BY THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER OR ON ITS BEHALF, OR SOLD OR OTHERWISE SUPPLIED BY THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER; AND

HOUSE BILL 1429 13
(II) DOES NOT HAVE AN ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITH AN UNAFFILIATED PERSON.
(C) “DOCUMENTATION” MEANS ANY MANUAL, DIAGRAM, REPORTING
OUTPUT, SERVICE CODE DESCRIPTION, SCHEMATIC, OR OTHER INFORMATION USED
IN EFFECTING THE SERVICES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF FARM
EQUIPMENT.
(D) (1) “FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS” MEANS COSTS AND TERMS THAT
ARE EQUIVALENT TO THE MOST FAVORABLE COSTS AND TERMS UNDER WHICH THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER OFFERS THE PART, TOOL, OR
DOCUMENTATION TO AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER:
(I) ACCOUNTING FOR:
1. ANY DISCOUNT, REBATE, OR CONVENIENT AND
TIMELY MEANS OF DELIVERY;
2. MEANS OF ENABLING FULLY RESTORED AND
UPDATED FUNCTIONALITY, RIGHTS OF USE, OR OTHER INCENTIVE OR PREFERENCE
THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER OFFERS TO AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR
PROVIDER; OR
3. ANY ADDITIONAL COST, BURDEN, OR IMPEDIMENT
THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER IMPOSES ON AN OWNER OR
INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER; AND
(II) NOT CONDITIONED ON HAVING AN ARRANGEMENT
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER.
(2) “FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS” INCLUDES ANY RELEVANT
UPDATES TO DOCUMENTATION AT NO CHARGE OR, IF THE DOCUMENTATION IS
REQUESTED IN PHYSICAL PRINTED FORM, A CHARGE THAT IS LIMITED TO THE
REASONABLE ACTUAL COSTS OF PREPARING AND SENDING THE COPY.
(E) (1) “FARM EQUIPMENT” MEANS EQUIPMENT THAT IS USED OR
INTENDED FOR USE IN A FARM OPERATION.
(2) “FARM EQUIPMENT” INCLUDES ANY COMBINE, TRACTOR,
IMPLEMENT, ENGINE, MOTOR, OR ATTACHMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1429
(3) “FARM EQUIPMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A VEHICLE AS DEFINED
IN § 11–176 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(F) “FARM EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER” MEANS A BUSINESS ENGAGED IN
SELLING, LEASING, OR OTHERWISE SUPPLYING NEW FARM EQUIPMENT, OR PARTS
OF FARM EQUIPMENT, MANUFACTURED BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE MANUFACTURER,
TO ANOTHER PERSON.
(G) (1) “INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON
OPERATING IN THE STATE THAT:
(I) DOES NOT HAVE AN ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER; AND
(II) IS NOT AFFILIATED WITH A PERSON THAT HAS AN
ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER WHEN THE PERSON IS ENGAGED IN THE
SERVICES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF FARM EQUIPMENT.
(2) “INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER” INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING
WHEN ENGAGED IN THE SERVICES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF
FARM EQUIPMENT THAT IS NOT MANUFACTURED BY OR ON BEHALF OF, OR SOLD OR
OTHERWISE SUPPLIED BY, THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER:
(I) AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER; AND
(II) A PERSON THAT:
1. HAS AN ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER; OR
2. IS AFFILIATED WITH A PERSON THAT HAS AN
ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION WITH THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER.
(H) “PART” MEANS ANY REPLACEMENT PART, EITHER NEW OR USED, MADE
AVAILABLE BY OR TO AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER FOR PURPOSES OF
EFFECTING THE SERVICES OF MAINTENANCE OR REPAIR OF FARM EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURED BY OR ON BEHALF OF, SOLD BY, OR OTHERWISE SUPPLIED BY THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER.

HOUSE BILL 1429 15
(I) (1) “TOOL” MEANS ANY SOFTWARE PROGRAM, HARDWARE, OR OTHER
APPARATUS USED FOR DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF FARM
EQUIPMENT.
(2) “TOOL” INCLUDES SOFTWARE OR OTHER MECHANISMS THAT
PROVISION, PROGRAM, OR PAIR A PART, CALIBRATE FUNCTIONALITY, OR PERFORM
ANY OTHER FUNCTION REQUIRED TO BRING THE PRODUCT BACK TO FULLY
FUNCTIONAL CONDITION.
14–5202.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO FARM EQUIPMENT THAT IS SOLD OR
USED IN THE STATE.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE AN EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER OR AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER TO:
(1) DIVULGE A TRADE SECRET, AS DEFINED IN § 11–1201 OF THIS
ARTICLE, TO AN OWNER OR TO AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER EXCEPT AS
NECESSARY TO PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION, PARTS, AND TOOLS ON FAIR AND
REASONABLE TERMS; OR
(2) PROVIDE ACCESS TO DOCUMENTATION THAT DOES NOT SERVE A
SECURITY RESET, DIAGNOSTIC, SERVICE, OR REPAIR PURPOSE.
(C) THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE AN ORIGINAL
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER TO MAKE AVAILABLE A PART THAT IS NO LONGER
AVAILABLE TO THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER.
(D) A TERM IN AN ARRANGEMENT DESCRIBED IN § 14–5201(B) OF THIS
SUBTITLE BETWEEN AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER AND AN ORIGINAL
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER THAT PURPORTS TO WAIVE, AVOID, RESTRICT, OR
LIMIT THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER’S OBLIGATIONS TO COMPLY
WITH THIS SUBTITLE IS VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE.
14–5203.
(A) FOR FARM EQUIPMENT, OR PARTS FOR FARM EQUIPMENT,
MANUFACTURED BY AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER OR ON ITS BEHALF,
OR SOLD OR OTHERWISE SUPPLIED BY IT, AND SOLD USED IN THE STATE, THE
ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER SHALL, ON FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS,
MAKE AVAILABLE TO AN INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER OR OWNER OF THE FARM
EQUIPMENT DOCUMENTATION, PARTS, AND TOOLS, INCLUSIVE OF ANY UPDATES,

HOUSE BILL 1429
FOR PURPOSES OF DIAGNOSIS, MAINTENANCE, OR REPAIR OF THE FARM
EQUIPMENT.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A FARM
EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER THAT SELLS FARM EQUIPMENT THAT CONTAINS A
SECURITY–RELATED FUNCTION SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE TO AN OWNER OR
INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER, ON FAIR AND REASONABLE TERMS, ANY SPECIAL
DOCUMENTATION, TOOLS, AND PARTS NEEDED TO RESET THE LOCK OR FUNCTION.
(2) IF NECESSARY FOR SECURITY PURPOSES, A FARM EQUIPMENT
MANUFACTURER MAY PROVIDE INFORMATION NECESSARY TO RESET AN
IMMOBILIZER SYSTEM OR SECURITY–RELATED ELECTRONIC MODULE THROUGH A
SECURE DATA RELEASE SYSTEM.
(C) ANY PROVISION IN AN AUTHORIZED REPAIR AGREEMENT PURPORTING
TO WAIVE, AVOID, OR LIMIT A FARM EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER’S COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE VOID.
14–5204.
A FARM EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER MAY NOT KNOWINGLY MISREPRESENT
OR WITHHOLD FARM EQUIPMENT PART NUMBERS FROM A CUSTOMER FOR THE
PURPOSE OF PREVENTING THE CUSTOMER FROM SHOPPING FOR A COMPETITIVE
PRICE ON A REPLACEMENT PART.
14–5205.
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to abrogate, interfere with,
contradict, or alter the terms of any contract formed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.